Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-6,119
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to implement the Outpatient Surgical Procedures Data Act. Such rules and regulations shall comply with all applicable provisions of federal law and shall minimize the imposition of additional costs to reporting facilities.

Laws 2003, LB 73, § 9.